fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-2-mikisasakay_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - mîkisasâkay - ok : # -m animate noun, beaded coat, beaded dress AEW NI2
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Sg: mîkisasâkay
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nimîkisasâkay
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kimîkisasâkay
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nimîkisasâkânân
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg: kimîkisasâkânaw
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kimîkisasâkâwâw

     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Pl: mîkisasâkaya
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nimîkisasâkaya
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kimîkisasâkaya
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nimîkisasâkânâna
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl: kimîkisasâkânawa
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kimîkisasâkâwâwa
     
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Loc: mîkisasâkâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: nimîkisasâkâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: kimîkisasâkâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: nimîkisasâkânâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px21Pl+Loc: kimîkisasâkânâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: kimîkisasâkâwâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: omîkisasâkâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: omîkisasâkâwâhk
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: omîkisasâkâyihk

     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg:           [mîkisasâkâs,       mîkisasâkâsis]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg:     [nimîkisasâkâs,     nimîkisasâkâsis]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg:     [kimîkisasâkâs,     kimîkisasâkâsis]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg:     [nimîkisasâkâsinân, nimîkisasâkâsisinân]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg:    [kimîkisasâkâsinaw, kimîkisasâkâsisinaw]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg:     [kimîkisasâkâsiwâw, kimîkisasâkâsisiwâw]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg:     [omîkisasâkâs,      omîkisasâkâsis]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg:     [omîkisasâkâsiwâw,  omîkisasâkâsisiwâw]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg:  [omîkisasâkâsiyiw,  omîkisasâkâsisiyiw]
               
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl:           [mîkisasâkâsa,       mîkisasâkâsisa]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl:     [nimîkisasâkâsa,     nimîkisasâkâsisa]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl:     [kimîkisasâkâsa,     kimîkisasâkâsisa]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl:     [nimîkisasâkâsinâna, nimîkisasâkâsisinâna]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl:    [kimîkisasâkâsinawa, kimîkisasâkâsisinawa]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl:     [kimîkisasâkâsiwâwa, kimîkisasâkâsisiwâwa]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl:     [omîkisasâkâsa,      omîkisasâkâsisa]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl:     [omîkisasâkâsiwâwa,  omîkisasâkâsisiwâwa]
     mîkisasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl:  [omîkisasâkâsiyiwa,  omîkisasâkâsisiyiwa]

     
     
     
